xapian-core/languages/romanian1.sbl
/*
Department of Computational Linguistics,
Ruprecht-Karls-University of Heidelberg

Marina Stegarescu: mstegare@hotmail.com
Doina Gliga: doina_gliga@yahoo.co.uk
Erwin Glockner: eglockner@hotmail.com

2006.07.15
*/

routines (
    mark_regions
    R1 R2
    morhological_suffixes
    deriv_suffixes1
    deriv_suffixes2
    exception1
    verb_suffix
    residual_suffix
)

externals ( stem )
integers ( p1 p2 )
groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

stringdef a^        hex  'E2'  // â
stringdef ab        hex '103'  // ă
stringdef i^        hex  'EE'  // î
stringdef s,        hex '15F'  // ş
stringdef t,        hex '163'  // ţ

define v      'aeiouy{a^}{ab}{i^}'

define mark_regions as (
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    do(
        among (
            'coral' 'moral' 'social' 'canal' 'final' 'papagal' 'special' 'tractor' 'abator'
            'marar' 'declar' 'suf{ab}r'
            'polonic' 'voinic'
            'paravan' 'simultan' 'decan' 'decal' 'tiran'
            'caracter' 'tiner' 'acoper' 'descoper' 'sufer' 'numer'
            'orator' 'autor'
            'exprim' 'prim' 'ultim' 'optim' 'victim' 'antonim' 'sinonim'
            'adjectiv' 'conjunctiv' 'subjonctiv' 'substantiv' 'pozitiv' 'recidiv' 'infinitiv'
            'complet' 'absolut' 'debut' 'debit'
            'miros'
            'dantel' 'nuvel' 'tutel' 'model' 'cercel'
            'savant' 'ambulant'
            'aparat' 'ar{ab}t'
            'specific' 'critic'
            'oribil' 'probabil'
            'bine' 'feroce' 'atroce'

            // ... extensions possible here ...
        ) or (gopast v  gopast non-v)
        setmark p1
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
    )
)


define exception1 as (
    [substring] atlimit among (
        'cea' (<-'ce')
        'cel' (<- 'ce')
        'cei' (<- 'ce')
        'celui'(<- 'ce')
        'celei' (<- 'ce')
        'celor' (<- 'ce')
        'destul' 'astfel' 'altfel'
        'asupra' 'deasupra' 'asemenea' 'afar{ab}'
        'mai' 'nici' 'aici' 'apoi' 'musai' 'baremi' 'uneori' 'altminteri' 'deseori' 'numai'
        '{i^}nt{a^}i' 'p{a^}n{ab}' 'dup{ab}'
        'noi' 'voi' 'imi' 'i{t,}i' 'i{s,}i' 'cine' 'care'
        'cui' 'ori'
        'acest' 'pentru' 'sau'
        'c{ab}tre' 'despre' 'spre' 'dinspre' 'dintre' 'printre' '{i^}ntre' 'devreme' 'aproape' 'departe'
        'bine' 'feroce' 'atroce'
        'exprim' 'prim' 'ultim' 'optim' 'victim' 'antonim' 'sinonim'
        'fonem' 'extrem' 'poem' 'suprem'
    )
)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor


    define morhological_suffixes as (
        [substring] among (
            'ului' 'uri' 'urile' 'urilor' 'ul'
                (delete)
            'le'
                ( ('a' or 'o' <- 'l') or delete)
            'lui' 'lor' 'elor' 'ilor' 'ele' 'ile' 'ei' 'i' 'ii' 'e' 'a' '{ab}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define deriv_suffixes1 as (
        [substring] among (
            'ism' 'ist' 'i{s,}t'
                (R2 or R1 non-v delete)
            'iz' 'ant' '{ab}r' 'ar'
                (R2 non-v delete)

            'tor' 'toar' 'abil' 'ibil'
                (R1 or R2 delete)

            'ime' 'esc'
                (delete)
            'n{t,}'
                (R2 <- 'nt')
        )
    )

    define deriv_suffixes2 as (
        [substring] among (
            '{ab}r' 'ar'
                (R1 or R2 non-v delete)

            'anie' 'icel' 'giu' 'eal' '{ab}tat'
                (R2 non-v delete)


            'ulte{t,}' 'u{t,}' 'uc' 'u{s,}' 'el' 'oi'
                (R1 delete)

            'ir' 'im' 'i{s,}' 'iz' 'iv' 'aj' 'an' 'ac'
                (R1 or R2 non-v delete)

            'ic'
                (R2 or R1 delete)

            'er'
                (R1 or R2 non-v or 'i' delete)

            'os' 'o{s,}' 'oas'
                (('u' or 'i' or 'j' or 'r' or 'p') R1 delete)

            'ant' 'ean' 'liv' 'al'
                (R1 or R2 delete)

            '{s,}or' '{s,}oar'
                (R1 or R2 v delete)
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as (
        [substring] among (

            'eaz{ab}' 'eaza' 'ezi' 'ez' 'z{ab}'
                (R1 or R2 delete)
            'esc' 'easc{ab}' 'e{s,}ti' 'e{s,}te' 'im' 'i{t,}i'
                (R1 or R2 delete)

            'ai' 'a{s,}i' 'i{s,}i' 'am' '{ab}m' 'em'
            'au' 'r{ab}m' 'ea' 'u'
                 (R1 or R2 delete)
            '{t,}i'
                 (R1 'a' 'e' 'i' 'u' delete)
            'se' 'sei' 'se{s,}i' 'ser{ab}m' 'ser{ab}{t,}i' 'ser{ab}' 'r{ab}'
                 (R1 or R2 delete)
            'ind' '{i^}nd' '{a^}nd'
                 (R1 or R2 delete)
        )
    )

    define residual_suffix as (
        [substring] among (
            'a' '{ab}' 'e' 'u' 'i'
                (R1 or R2 non-v delete)

            'at' 'a{t,}' 'it' 'i{t,}' 'ut' 'u{t,}'
                (R2 or R1 delete)
        )
    )
)


define stem as (

    exception1 or
    not hop 3 or (
        do mark_regions
        backwards (

            do (verb_suffix or morhological_suffixes)

            do deriv_suffixes1
            do deriv_suffixes2
            residual_suffix

        )
    )
)
